Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 48. Commission on Civics Education.

§§ 30-313 through 30-318.

Expired June 30, 2013.

Editor’s note.

Section 30-318 had provided for a July 1, 2012, expiration date for this chapter.
However, the chapter was still set out pursuant to Acts 2012, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, c. 806, Item 130 E, which provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the expiration date for the Commission on Civics Education is hereby extended to June 30, 2013.” Acts 2013, c. 667, purported to amend § 30-318 to extend the sunset date to July 1, 2016. However, Acts 2013, c. 667, did not take effect until July 1, 2013, and the expiration date was June 30, 2013.

Acts 2013, c. 667, cl. 2, repealed Acts 2009, c. 859, cl. 2 which made this chapter expire should appropriation or funding not be provided.

Former § 30-313, commission on Civics Education; purpose; membership; terms; meetings; voting, was enacted by Acts 2009, c. 859.

Former § 30-314, compensation; expenses, was enacted by Acts 2009, c. 859.

Former § 30-315, commission on Civics Education Fund established, was enacted by Acts 2009, c. 859.

Former § 30-316, powers and duties; report, was enacted by Acts 2009, c. 859.

Former § 30-317, staffing, was enacted by Acts 2009, c. 859.

Former § 30-318, sunset, was enacted by Acts 2009, c. 859.